Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1207
Violation; liability; computation of amount.

In addition to costs and a reasonable attorney's fee, a collegiate athletic association that violates the Nebraska Collegiate Athletic Association Procedures Act shall be liable to the aggrieved college or university for an amount equal to one hundred percent of the monetary loss per year or portion of a year suffered during the period that any monetary loss occurs due to a penalty imposed in violation of the act. For purposes of calculating monetary loss, one hundred percent of the yearly loss shall be equal to the gross amount realized by the affected athletic program during the immediately preceding calendar year.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 7.